src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NOUN_JALAT
!!€gt-norm:  Noun 9 k~’~0 plurt
!!€  jalat: jalat+N+Pl+Nom # feet
!!€  jalka: jalat+N+Sg+Nom
0:a  NOUN_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT  ;
0:ko  NOUN_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:o  NOUN_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
+Use/NG:’o  NOUN_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ko  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:ko  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
+Use/NG:ka  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:ko  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:ka  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
+Use/NG:’a  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0:ko  NOUN_COMPOUND_JEN  ;
+Use/NG:ka  NOUN_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON NOUN_KENGÄT
!!€gt-norm:  Noun xxx a front kg plurt
!!€  kengät: kengät+N+Pl+Nom # shoes
!!$  kenkä: kengät+N+Sg+Nom
0:gä  NOUN_FRONT_PLNOM_CLIT  ;
0:k  NOUN_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:g  NOUN_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:k  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0:k  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:kä  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:k  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:kä  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:gä  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0:k  NOUN_COMPOUND_IEN  ;
0:kä  NOUN_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON NOUN_PYHÄT
!!€gt-norm:  Noun 10 front plurt
!!€  pyhät: pyhät+N+Pl+Nom # celebration
!!€  pyhä: pyhät+N+Sg+Nom
0:ä  NOUN_FRONT_PLNOM_CLIT  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:ä  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:ä  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:ä  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:ä  NOUN_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON NOUN_SOITTAJAT
!!€gt-norm:  Noun 10 back plurt
!!€  soittajat: soittajat+N+Pl+Nom
!!€  soittaja:  soittajat+N+Sg+Nom
0:a  NOUN_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:a  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:a  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:a  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:a  NOUN_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON NOUN_RAVET
!!€gt-norm:  Noun 8 plurt
!!€  ravet: ravet+N+Pl+Nom # rave
!!$  rave: ravet+N+Sg+Nom
0  NOUN_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_JEN  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON NOUN_BÄNET
!!€gt-norm:  Noun 8  front  plurt
!!€  bänet: bänet+N+Pl+Nom # breakup
!!$  bäne: bänet+N+Sg+Nom
0  NOUN_FRONT_PLNOM_CLIT  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
+Use/NG:0  NOUN_COMPOUND_JEN  ;

LEXICON NOUN_KITARAT
!!€gt-norm:  Noun 13 a back plurt
!!€  kitarat: kitarat+N+Pl+Nom # guitars
!!$  kitara:  kitarat+N+Sg+Nom
0:a  NOUN_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT  ;
0:o  NOUN_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:o  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0:o  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA ;
0:o  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:o  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
+Use/NG:o  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN ;
0:o  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:a  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:a  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0:o  NOUN_COMPOUND_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:o  NOUN_COMPOUND_ITTEN  ;

LEXICON NOUN_MARKKINAT
!!€gt-norm:  Noun 12 a front plurt
!!€  markkinat: markkinat+N+Pl+Nom # market
!!$  markkina: markkinat+N+Sg+Nom
0:a  NOUN_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT  ;
0:o  NOUN_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:o  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0:o  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:o  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
+Use/NG:a  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:o  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:a  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:a  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0:o  NOUN_COMPOUND_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:o  NOUN_COMPOUND_ITTEN  ;
+Use/NG:a  NOUN_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON NOUN_HIPAT
!!€gt-norm:  Noun 9 a front pp plurt
!!€  hipat: hipat+N+Pl+Nom # party
!!$  hippa: hipat+N+Sg+Nom
0:po  NOUN_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:o  NOUN_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:po  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:po  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
+Use/NG:pa  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:po  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:pa  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:a  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0:po  NOUN_COMPOUND_JEN  ;
+Use/NG:pa  NOUN_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON NOUN_KUOPAT
!!€gt-norm:  Noun 10 a back p plurt
!!€  kuopat: kuopat+N+Pl+Nom holes ?
!!$  kuoppa: kuopat+N+Sg+Nom
0:a  NOUN_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT  ;
0:p  NOUN_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0    NOUN_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:p  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0:p  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:pa  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:p  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:pa  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:a  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0:p  NOUN_COMPOUND_IEN  ;
0:pa  NOUN_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON NOUN_RAUDAT
!!€gt-norm:  Noun 9 dat plurt
!!€  raudat: raudat+N+Pl+Nom # irons
!!$  rauta: raudat+Sg+Nom
0:da  NOUN_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT  ;
0:to  NOUN_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:do  NOUN_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:to  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:to  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
+Use/NG:ta  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:to  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:ta  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:da  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0:to  NOUN_COMPOUND_JEN  ;
+Use/NG:ta  NOUN_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON NOUN_TAVAT
!!€gt-norm:  Noun 9 vat plurt
!!€  tavat: tavat+N+Pl+Nom # manners
!!$  tapa: tavat+N+Sg+Nom
0:va  NOUN_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT  ;
0:po  NOUN_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:vo  NOUN_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:po  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:po  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
+Use/NG:pa  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:po  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:pa  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:va  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0:po  NOUN_COMPOUND_JEN  ;
+Use/NG:pa  NOUN_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON NOUN_LUVAT
!!€gt-norm:  Noun 10 vat plurt
!!€  luvat: lubvat+N+Pl+Nom # manners
!!$  lupa:  luvat+N+Sg+Nom
0:va  NOUN_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT  ;
0:p   NOUN_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:v   NOUN_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:p   NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0:p   NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:pa  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:p   NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:pa  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:va  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0:p   NOUN_COMPOUND_JEN  ;
+Use/NG:pa  NOUN_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON NOUN_VALLAT
!!€gt-norm:  Noun 9 lat plurt
!!$  vallat: vallat+N+Pl+Nom # states
!!€  valta: vallat+N+Sg+Nom
0:la  NOUN_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT  ;
0:to  NOUN_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:lo  NOUN_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:to  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:to  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
+Use/NG:ta  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:to  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:ta  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:la  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0:to  NOUN_COMPOUND_JEN  ;
+Use/NG:ta  NOUN_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON NOUN_VARAT
!!€gt-norm:  Noun 9 rrt plurt
!!€  varat: varat+N+Pl+Nom # budget
!!$  vara: varat+N+Sg+Nom
0:a  NOUN_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT  ;
0:o  NOUN_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:o  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:o  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
+Use/NG:a  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:o  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:a  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:a  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0:o  NOUN_COMPOUND_JEN  ;
+Use/NG:a  NOUN_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON NOUN_JUHLAT
!!€gt-norm:  Noun 10 t plurt
!!€  juhlat: juhlat+N+Pl+Nom # party
!!$  juhla: juhlat+N+Sg+Nom
0:a  NOUN_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:a  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:a  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:a  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:a  NOUN_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON NOUN_KIHARAT
!!€gt-norm:  Noun 11 ihi t plurt
!!€  kiharat: kiharat+N+Pl+Nom # curls
!!$  kihara: kiharat+N+Sg+Nom
0:a  NOUN_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT  ;
0:o  NOUN_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0:o  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
+Use/NG:o  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:o  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:o  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
+Use/NG:o  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
+Use/NG:a  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:o  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:a  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:a  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:o  NOUN_COMPOUND_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:o  NOUN_COMPOUND_ITTEN  ;
+Use/NG:o  NOUN_COMPOUND_JEN  ;
+Use/NG:a  NOUN_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON NOUN_KÄRÄJÄT
!!€  käräjät: käräjät+N+Pl+Nom # court
0  NOUN_FRONT_PLNOM_CLIT ;
+Use/NG:  NOUN_KÄRÄJÄT_FORMS ; ! according to corpus mostly short forms are used
