src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NOUN_Cmp
akselivallat+N:akseli#val  NOUN_VALLAT  ;
akselivallat+N:akselival  NOUN_VALLAT  ;
aktiivat+N:aktiiv  NOUN_KIHARAT  ;
ansaraudat+N:ansarau NOUN_RAUDAT ;
apupyörät+N:apu#pyör NOUN_PYHÄT ;
bänet+N:bäne  NOUN_BÄNET  ;
bermudat+N:bermud  NOUN_VARAT  ;
chukka-kengät+N:chukka-ken  NOUN_KENGÄT  ;
ehtoollisastiat+N:ehtoollisasti  NOUN_MARKKINAT  ;
enkelinkiharat+N:enkelin#kihar  NOUN_KIHARAT  ;
ensikengät+N:ensiken  NOUN_KENGÄT  ;
filmijuhlat+N:filmijuhl  NOUN_JUHLAT  ;
hammasraudat+N:hammas#rau  NOUN_RAUDAT  ;
hammasraudat+N:hammasrau  NOUN_RAUDAT  ;
herännäisseurat+N:herännäis#seur  NOUN_VARAT  ;
herättäjäjuhlat+N:herättäjäjuhl  NOUN_JUHLAT  ;
hikilaudat+N:hiki#lau  NOUN_RAUDAT  ;
hikilaudat+N:hikilau  NOUN_RAUDAT  ;
hovitavat+N:hovi#ta  NOUN_TAVAT  ;
hovitavat+N:hovita  NOUN_TAVAT  ;
ihmistavat+N:ihmis#ta  NOUN_TAVAT  ;
ihmistavat+N:ihmista  NOUN_TAVAT  ;
jalkaraudat+N:jalka#rau  NOUN_RAUDAT  ;
jalkaraudat+N:jalkarau  NOUN_RAUDAT  ;
johdannaismarkkinat+N:johdannaismarkkin  NOUN_MARKKINAT  ;
joulunpyhät+N:joulun#pyh NOUN_PYHÄT ;
juhlakengät+N:juhla#ken  NOUN_KENGÄT  ;
kaklattajat+N:kaklattaj  NOUN_JUHLAT  ;
kamferitipat+N:kamferi#tip  NOUN_HIPAT  ;
kamferitipat+N:kamferitip  NOUN_HIPAT  ;
käsiraudat+N:käsi#rau  NOUN_RAUDAT  ;
katarat+N:katara  NOUN_KIHARAT  ;
katsurat+N:katsur  NOUN_MARKKINAT  ;
kaulanikamat+N:kaula#nikam  NOUN_SOITTAJAT ;
käytöstavat+N:käytös#ta  NOUN_TAVAT ;
kesäkengät+N:kesä#ken  NOUN_KENGÄT  ;
kesäkisat+N:kesä#kis  NOUN_VARAT  ;
ketunraudat+N:ketun#rau  NOUN_RAUDAT  ;
kirkkopäivät+N:kirkko#päivä  NOUN_KÄRÄJÄT  ;
korkokengät+N:korko#ken  NOUN_KENGÄT  ;
korvatipat+N:korva#tip  NOUN_HIPAT  ;
korvatipat+N:korvatip  NOUN_HIPAT  ;
korvatulpat+N:korva#tulp NOUN_KUOPAT ;
kotihipat+N:koti#hip  NOUN_HIPAT  ;
kotihipat+N:kotihip  NOUN_HIPAT  ;
kotimarkkinat+N:kotimarkkin  NOUN_MARKKINAT  ;
kuninkaankäräjät+N:kuninkaan#käräjä  NOUN_KÄRÄJÄT  ;
kurekengät+N:kure#ken  NOUN_KENGÄT  ;
lahovalmuskat+N:laho#valmusk NOUN_KITARAT ;
lähtökuopat+N:lähtö#kuop  NOUN_KUOPAT  ;
lähtökuopat+N:lähtökuop  NOUN_KUOPAT  ;
läksiäissanat+N:läksiäis#san  NOUN_VARAT  ;
lannenikamat+N:lanne#nikam  NOUN_SOITTAJAT ;
länsivallat+N:länsi#val  NOUN_VALLAT  ;
länsivallat+N:länsival  NOUN_VALLAT  ;
lantalaiskengät+N:lantalais#ken  NOUN_KENGÄT  ;
lentävätkoirat+N:lentävätkoir  NOUN_JUHLAT  ;
liittopäivät+N:liitto#päivä  NOUN_KÄRÄJÄT  ;
lumikengät+N:lumi#ken  NOUN_KENGÄT  ;
luottomarkkinat+N:luottomarkkin  NOUN_MARKKINAT  ;
maakuntakäräjät+N:maa#kunta#käräjä  NOUN_KÄRÄJÄT  ;
maapäivät+N:maa#päivä  NOUN_KÄRÄJÄT  ;
maksettavat+N:maksettav  NOUN_JUHLAT  ;
merivoimat+N:merivoim  NOUN_JUHLAT  ;
mimosat+N:mimosa  NOUN_KIHARAT  ;
muistosanat+N:muistosan  NOUN_VARAT  ;
napsijat+N:napsij  NOUN_MARKKINAT  ;
nenätipat+N:nenä#tip  NOUN_HIPAT  ;
nenätipat+N:nenätip  NOUN_HIPAT  ;
neuvottelupäivät+N:neuvottelu#päivä  NOUN_KÄRÄJÄT  ;
nuhatipat+N:nuhatip  NOUN_HIPAT  ;
oltavat+N:oltav  NOUN_JUHLAT  ;
päätössanat+N:päätössan  NOUN_VARAT  ;
pestuumarkkinat+N:pestuumarkkin  NOUN_MARKKINAT  ;
pikakäräjät+N:pikakäräjä  NOUN_KÄRÄJÄT  ;
pikkukengät+N:pikkuken  NOUN_KENGÄT  ;
poronjäkälät+N:poron#jäkäl NOUN_PYHÄT ;
pöytätavat+N:pöytä#ta  NOUN_TAVAT ;
puolustusvoimat+N:puolustusvoim  NOUN_JUHLAT  ;
pyyntiraudat+N:pyyntirau NOUN_RAUDAT ;
ravet+N:rave  NOUN_RAVET  ;
riekonjalat+N:riekon#jal NOUN_JALAT ;
rippisanat+N:rippisan  NOUN_VARAT  ;
säärikarvat+N:sääri#karv  NOUN_MARKKINAT  ;
sarviapilat+N:sarvi#apil NOUN_KITARAT ;
sekahedelmät+N:sekahedelmä  NOUN_KÄRÄJÄT  ;
silmätipat+N:silmätip  NOUN_HIPAT  ;
soistumistavat+N:soistumis#ta  NOUN_TAVAT ;
sotavoimat+N:sota#voim  NOUN_JUHLAT  ;
sukupuoliasiat+N:suku#puoli#asi  NOUN_MARKKINAT  ;
talvikisat+N:talvikis  NOUN_VARAT  ;
torvijäkälät+N:torvi#jäkäl NOUN_PYHÄT ;
ulappaliitäjät+N:ulappa#liitäj NOUN_PYHÄT ;
vaelluskengät+N:vaellus#ken  NOUN_KENGÄT  ;
vanhuudenpäivät+N:vanhuudenpäivä  NOUN_KÄRÄJÄT  ;
vasemmistovoimat+N:vasemmistovoim  NOUN_JUHLAT  ;
veikkausvoittovarat+N:veikkaus#voitto#var  NOUN_VARAT  ;
yhdysvallat+N:yhdysval  NOUN_VALLAT  ;
yhteismarkkinat+N:yhteis#markkin  NOUN_MARKKINAT  ;
osanottajat+N:osan#ottaj  NOUN_SOITTAJAT ;
